Utah statutes.
36-1-103.   Senate districts -- Copies -- Legal boundaries.

(1) (a)  The Legislature shall file a copy of the Senate block assignment file enacted by the Legislature with the lieutenant governor's office.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection 36-1-101.5(5), the legal boundaries of Senate districts are contained in the Senate block assignment file on file with the lieutenant governor's office.

(2) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  generate maps of each Utah State Senate district from the Senate block assignment file and modifications to boundaries made in Subsection 36-1-101.5(5); and

(ii)  ensure that those maps are available for viewing on the lieutenant governor's website.

(b)  If there is any inconsistency between the maps, the Senate block assignment file, and the modifications made to boundaries in Subsection 36-1-101.5(5), the Senate block assignment file as adjusted by the modifications to boundaries made in Subsection 36-1-101.5(5) are controlling.

